Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Chapter 19

Powers Under City Manager-Commission Charter

6-19-101. General powers.

Every city incorporated under chapters 18-22 of this title may:

Assess, levy and collect taxes for all general and special purposes on all subjects or objects of taxation, and privileges taxable by law for municipal purposes;

Adopt such classifications of the subjects and objects of taxation as may not be contrary to law;

Make special assessments for local improvements;

Contract and be contracted with;

Incur debts by borrowing money or otherwise, and give any appropriate evidence thereof, in the manner provided in this section;

Issue and give, sell, pledge, or in any manner dispose of, negotiable or nonnegotiable interest-bearing or noninterest-bearing bonds, warrants, promissory notes or orders of the city, upon the credit of the city or solely upon the credit of specific property owned by the city, or solely upon the credit of income derived from any property used in connection with any public utility owned or operated by the city, or solely upon the credit of the proceeds of special assessments for local improvements, or upon any two (2) or more such credits;

Expend the money of the city for all lawful purposes;

Acquire or receive and hold, maintain, improve, sell, lease, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of property, real or personal, and any estate or interest therein, within or without the city or state;

Condemn property, real or personal or any easement, interest, or estate or use therein, either within or without the city, for present or future public use; such condemnation to be made and effected in accordance with the terms and provisions of title 29, chapter 16, or in such other manner as may be provided by general law;

Take and hold property within or without the city or state upon trust; and administer trusts for the public benefit;

Acquire, construct, own, operate and maintain, or sell, lease, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of public utilities or any estate or interest therein, or any other utility that is of service to the city, its inhabitants, or any part of the city;

Grant to any person, firm, association, or corporation franchises for public utilities and public services to be furnished the city and those in the city. Such power to grant franchises shall embrace the power hereby expressly conferred, to grant exclusive franchises. When an exclusive franchise is granted, it shall be exclusive not only as against any other person, firm, association, or corporation, but also as against the city itself. Franchises may be granted for the period of twenty-five (25) years or less, but not longer, except as provided in § 65-4-107(b). The board of commissioners may prescribe in each grant of a franchise, the rates, fares, charges, and regulations that may be made by the grantee of the franchise. Franchises may by their terms apply to the territory within the corporate limits of the city at the date of the franchises, and as the corporate limits thereafter may be enlarged; and to the then existing streets, alleys, and other thoroughfares that may be opened after the grant of the franchise;

Make contracts with any person, firm, association or corporation, for public utilities and public services to be furnished the city and those in the city. Such power to make contracts shall embrace the power, expressly conferred, to make exclusive contracts. When an exclusive contract is entered into, it shall be exclusive not only against any other person, firm, association or corporation, but also as against the city itself. Such contracts may be entered into for the period of twenty-five (25) years or less, but not longer. The board of commissioners may prescribe in each such contract entered into, the rates, fares, charges, and regulations that may be made by the person, firm, association, or corporation with whom the contract is made. Such contracts may by their terms apply to the territory within the corporate limits of the city at the date of the contract, and as the corporate limits thereafter may be enlarged; and to the then existing streets, alleys and thoroughfares and to any other streets, alleys and other thoroughfares that may be opened after the grant of the contract;

Prescribe reasonable regulations regarding the construction, maintenance, equipment, operation and service of public utilities and compel, from time to time, reasonable extensions of facilities for such services, but nothing in this subdivision (14) shall be construed to permit the alteration or impairment of any of the terms or provisions of any exclusive franchise granted or of any exclusive contract entered into under subdivisions (12) and (13);

Establish, open, relocate, vacate, alter, widen, extend, grade, improve, repair, construct, reconstruct, maintain, light, sprinkle, and clean public highways, streets, boulevards, parkways, sidewalks, alleys, parks, public grounds, and squares, wharves, bridges, viaducts, subways, tunnels, sewers and drains within or without the corporate limits and regulate the use thereof within the corporate limits, and property may be taken and appropriated therefor under §§ 7-31-107 — 7-31-111 and 29-16-203, or in such other manner as may be provided by general laws;

Construct, improve, reconstruct and reimprove by opening, extending, widening, grading, curbing, guttering, paving, graveling, macadamizing, draining, or otherwise improving any streets, highways, avenues, alleys or other public places within the corporate limits, and assess a portion of the cost of such improvements upon the property abutting upon or adjacent to such streets, highways or alleys as provided by title 7, chapters 32 and 33;

Assess against abutting property within the corporate limits the cost of planting shade trees, removing from sidewalks all accumulations of snow, ice, and earth, cutting and removing obnoxious weeds and rubbish, street lighting, street sweeping, street sprinkling, street flushing and street oiling, the cleaning and rendering sanitary or removal, abolishing, and prohibiting of closets and privies, in such manner as may be provided by general law or by ordinance of the board of commissioners;

Acquire, purchase, provide for, construct, regulate, and maintain and do all things relating to all marketplaces, public buildings, bridges, sewers and other structures, works and improvements;

Collect and dispose of drainage, sewage, ashes, garbage, refuse or other waste, or license and regulate such collection and disposal, and the cost of such collection, regulation or disposal may be funded by taxation or special assessment to the property owner;

License and regulate all persons, firms, corporations, companies and associations engaged in any business, occupation, calling, profession, or trade not forbidden by law;

Impose a license tax upon any animal, thing, business, vocation, pursuit, privilege, or calling not prohibited by law;

Define, prohibit, abate, suppress, prevent and regulate all acts, practices, conduct, business, occupations, callings, trades, uses of property and all other things whatsoever detrimental, or liable to be detrimental, to the health, morals, comfort, safety, convenience, or welfare of the inhabitants of the city, and to exercise general police powers;

Prescribe limits within which business occupations and practices liable to be nuisances or detrimental to the health, morals, security or general welfare of the people may lawfully be established, conducted or maintained;

Inspect, test, measure and weigh any article for consumption or use within the city, and charge reasonable fees therefor, and to provide standards of weights, tests and measures in such manner as may be provided pursuant to title 47, chapter 26, part 9;

Establish, regulate, license and inspect weights and measures in accordance with subdivision (24);

Regulate the location, bulk, occupancy, area, lot, location, height, construction and materials of all buildings and structures in accordance with general law, and to inspect all buildings, lands and places as to their condition for health, cleanliness and safety, and when necessary, prevent the use thereof and require any alteration or changes necessary to make them healthful, clean or safe;

Provide and maintain charitable, educational, recreative, curative, corrective, detentive, or penal institutions, departments, functions, facilities, instrumentalities, conveniences and services;

Purchase or construct, maintain and establish a correctional facility for the confinement and detention of persons who violate laws within the corporate limits of the city, or to contract with the county to keep these persons in the correctional facility of the county and to enforce the payment of fines and costs in accordance with §§ 40-24-104 and 40-24-105 or through contempt proceedings in accordance with general law;

Enforce any ordinance, rule or regulation by fines, forfeitures and penalties, and by other actions or proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction;

Establish schools, to the extent authorized pursuant to general law, determine the necessary boards, officers and teachers required therefor, and fix their compensation, purchase or otherwise acquire land for schoolhouses, playgrounds and other purposes connected with the schools; purchase or erect all necessary buildings and do all other acts necessary to establish, maintain and operate a complete educational system within the city;

Regulate, tax, license or suppress the keeping or going at large of animals within the city, impound the same and, in default of redemption, to sell or kill the same;

Call elections as provided in this charter; and

Have and exercise all powers that now or hereafter it would be competent for this charter specifically to enumerate, as fully and completely as though such powers were specifically enumerated in this section.

In addition to the general powers provided in subsection (a), any city incorporated under chapters 18-22 of this title may, upon the adoption of an ordinance by a two thirds (2/3) vote of the board of commissioners, impose a fee for the specific purpose of raising revenue to fund the construction and maintenance of a municipal fire station and fire department and for no other purpose.

Any city establishing a fee under this subsection (b) shall provide in the ordinance a system for the collection and enforcement of fees authorized and imposed pursuant to this subsection (b).

The amount of the fee shall initially be set by the city in the ordinance imposing the fee. The ordinance may provide for a means of increasing and decreasing the fee as determined by the board of commissioners. After the construction of the fire station for which the fee is initially imposed, the city shall reduce the fee to reflect only the cost of maintenance of the fire station or operation of the municipal fire department unless additional fire stations are needed.

If a city imposing a fee under this subsection (b) is in a county that imposes a fire fee:

The fees established under this subsection (b) shall not be set in excess of the rates imposed by the county at the time the city adopts the ordinance pursuant to subdivision (b)(1); and

The county shall not collect the fire fee from residents after the date the city adopts the ordinance pursuant to subdivision (b)(1).

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 3, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1997a131; Code 1932, § 3528; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(31); 1977, ch. 344, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1901; Acts 1989, ch. 175, § 3; 1995, ch. 13, §§ 8, 9; 2011, ch. 453, § 6; 2014, ch. 927, § 7; 2016, ch. 645, § 3; 2017, ch. 459, § 1.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment substituted “, but not longer, except as provided in § 65-4-107(b).” for “, but not longer” at the end of the fourth sentence of (12).

The 2017 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 645, § 4. March 23, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 459, § 2. May 25, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 8; 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 28.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. City development of residential real estate, OAG 98-042, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (2/17/98).

Constitutionality of municipal truck weight restrictions, OAG 98-0128, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 128 (7/20/98).

Municipalities have the authority to enact child curfew laws, OAG 00-158, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 161 (10/17/00).

Unless and until the legislature enacts legislation implementing a state lottery, which would include authorization for the sale of lottery tickets statewide, a local government may enact an ordinance prohibiting the sale of lottery tickets within its jurisdiction, OAG 03-004, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 4 (1/17/03).

Cities and counties lack statutory authority to regulate mortgage transactions, OAG 03-016, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/11/03).

Adoption of ordinance requiring persons who lease residential real property within a municipality to obtain an annual license and pay a charge for each unit leased, OAG 06-103, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 112 (6/21/06).

Local governments may regulate itinerant vendors and temporary sales activity that takes place along a state highway, OAG 08-188, 2008 Tenn. AG LEXIS 233 (12/16/08).

Regulation of distribution of ephedrine and pseudoephedrine by local governments. OAG 13-99, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 102 (12/6/13).

The city of Lakeland, a municipality organized under a city manager-commission charter, does not have the authority to impose mandatory fees upon its residents to fund fire protection services. A general law of local application authorizing the city of Lakeland, but not other municipalities, to impose mandatory fees upon its residents for fire protection services would be constitutionally suspect. OAG 17-06, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 6 (1/30/2017).

6-19-102. Enumeration of powers not exclusive.

The enumeration of particular powers in this charter is not exclusive of others, nor restrictive of general words or phrases granting powers, nor shall a grant or failure to grant power in this chapter impair a power granted in any other part of this charter, and whether powers, objects, or purposes are expressed, conjunctively or disjunctively, they shall be construed so as to permit the city to exercise freely any one (1) or more such powers as to any one (1) or more such objects for any one (1) or more such purposes.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 3, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1997a132; Code 1932, § 3529; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1902.

Attorney General Opinions. City development of residential real estate, OAG 98-042, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (2/17/98).

6-19-103. School systems.

Such town may establish, erect, and maintain public schools, and may assess and levy taxes for such purpose.

Acts 1921, ch. 175, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 2023a53b1; Code 1932, § 3647; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1903.

Cross-References. Operation of schools under city manager-commission charters, title 6, ch. 21, part 8.

6-19-104. Purchasing and contract procedures.

The city manager shall be responsible for all city purchasing, but the city manager may delegate the duty to make purchases to any subordinate appointed by the city manager.

Competitive prices for all purchases and public improvements shall be obtained whenever practicable and in accordance with regulations established by ordinance, and the purchase made from or the contract awarded to the lowest and best bidder; provided, that the city may reject any and all bids.

Formal sealed bids shall be obtained in all transactions involving the expenditure of an amount to be set by ordinance. The amount set shall be equal to or greater than the amount set in chapter 56, part 3 of this title, but may not be greater than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The transaction shall be evidenced by written contract. In cases where the board indicates by unanimous resolution of those present at the meeting, based upon the written recommendation of the manager, that it is clearly to the advantage of the city not to contract with competitive bidding, it may authorize noncompetitive contracts.

The city manager may reject all bids and authorize the making of public improvements or accomplishment of any other city work by any city department.

Purchasing and contract procedures not prescribed by this charter or other law may be established by ordinance.

The board of commissioners may by ordinance delegate to the city manager the authority to enter into binding contracts on behalf of the city, without specific board approval, in routine matters and matters having insubstantial long-term consequences. The ordinance shall enumerate the types of matters to which the city manager's authority extends and may place other limitations on the city manager's authority under this subsection (f). As used in this subsection (f), “routine matters and matters having insubstantial long-term consequences” means any contract for which expenditures during the fiscal year will be less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 21, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1997a243; Code 1932, § 3641; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1905; Acts 1989, ch. 175, § 4; 1999, ch. 270, § 1.

Cross-References. Powers of city manager to execute contracts, § 6-21-108.

6-19-105. Retirement benefits.

The board of commissioners may provide for the retirement of the city's full-time nonelective officers and employees and make available to them any group, life, hospital, health, or accident insurance, either independently of, or as a supplement to, any retirement or other employee welfare benefits otherwise provided by law.

Acts 1975, ch. 179, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-1906.